Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 1 Hunting, Trapping, or Fishing
27-2-27.
Administrative penalties in lieu of revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal.

In addition to the authority granted in Code Sections 27-2-4 and 27-2-25 to revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any license or permit, or both, the commissioner or board, or the commissioner and board, may impose a reasonable penalty, with the written consent of the affected party or parties, not to exceed $1,000.00 for each and every violation, in lieu of revocation, suspension, denial, or nonrenewal of a license or permit, or both. All penalties recovered by the commissioner as provided in this Code section shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-324, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-2-28.
Refusing inspection of identification or license; making false statements in obtaining license or permit; counterfeiting or alteration; unlawful collection of funds.

It shall be unlawful for any person who is required to have on his person any license, permit, or stamp issued under this title to refuse the inspection of such license, permit, or stamp upon demand by a game warden or deputy game warden. It shall also be unlawful for any such person, upon demand by a game warden or deputy game warden, to refuse to provide a driver’s license or equally reliable identification of such person and his current residence.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make any false statement as to any fact which is required as a prerequisite to the issuance of a license or permit; and any license or permit obtained in violation of this Code section is void. Any license agent may require the applicant for a license or permit to show proof of any statement or facts required for issuance of any license or permit.

It shall be unlawful for any person to counterfeit, change, or alter or to attempt to counterfeit, change, or alter any license or permit issued pursuant to this title. It shall be unlawful for any person, other than a license agent authorized by the department or authorized personnel of the department, to collect any funds for any license or permit issued pursuant to this title or to charge a fee to obtain any such license or permit.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, § 36; Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 27; Code 1933, §§ 45-203, 45-214; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, §§ 29, 30; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 8; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1290, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 924, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 12/HB 208; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (c), in the second sentence, inserted “authorized by the department” in the middle and added “or to charge a fee to obtain any such license or permit” at the end. See Editor’s note for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in four places in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-29.
Free fishing days.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the commissioner may designate not more than three days, which need not be consecutive, in each calendar year as free fishing days during which residents may, without obtaining a fishing license, exercise the privileges of a holder of a fishing license, subject to all limitations, restrictions, conditions, rules, and regulations applicable to the holder of a fishing license. This Code section shall in no way affect the commercial fishing licenses required under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 536, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1179, § 3.

27-2-30.
Establishment of the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund; investment of moneys held in the fund; compliance with constitutional provisions; annual accounting of funds; limitations on expenditures from the fund.

The General Assembly recognizes that lifetime sportsman’s license purchasers expect and are entitled to assurance that funds for such licenses will be used throughout their life expectancy to provide quality hunting and fishing experiences. Therefore, the General Assembly declares its intent that lifetime licenses yield annual revenue in perpetuity for the support of wildlife management programs of the department and recognizes that annual income generation is necessary for these licenses to be included in apportionment formulas for federal fish and wildlife funding.

In recognition of its obligations to lifetime sportsman’s license purchasers, the General Assembly directs the state treasurer to establish the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund as a separate fund in the state treasury and all funds held in the Wildlife Endowment Fund previously established by this Code section shall be transferred to the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund.

The state treasurer shall invest the money held in the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund in the same manner in which state funds are invested as authorized by the State Depository Board pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 17 of Title 50. Interest earned by the money held in the trust fund shall be accounted for separately and shall be credited to the trust fund to be disbursed as other moneys in the trust fund. The fund is authorized to accept donations from private individuals and entities.

Under the authority granted and subject to the conditions imposed by Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(r) of the Constitution of Georgia, for the period beginning on July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2032, all of the money collected pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 27-2-3.1 shall be annually appropriated to the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund established by subsection (b) of this Code section and such funds shall not lapse as otherwise required by Article III, Section IX, Paragraph IV(c) of the Constitution of Georgia. Each annual appropriation shall be made through the General Appropriations Act and shall include all of the money collected from such source during the most recently completed fiscal year.

(c.1)

The commissioner of natural resources shall be the trustee of the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund with full authority over the administration of the fund.

(c.2)

All of the money appropriated to the Wildlife Endowment Trust Fund pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section shall be dedicated for use and expended by the commissioner of natural resources for the purposes provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

(c.3)

The commissioner of natural resources shall prepare an accounting of the funds expended pursuant to this Code section during the most recently completed fiscal year to be provided to the Office of Planning and Budget, the House Budget and Research Office, and the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office by January 1 of each year.

The Wildlife Endowment Fund constitutes a special trust derived from a contractual relationship between the state and the members of the public whose lifetime license purchases contribute to the fund. In recognition of such special trust, the following limitations and restrictions are placed on expenditures from the fund:

No expenditures or disbursements from appropriations equivalent to the income or proceeds derived from the sales of Types I and Y lifetime sportsman’s licenses shall be made for any purpose until the respective holders of such licenses attain the age of 16 years. The state treasurer, as custodian of the fund, shall determine actuarially from time to time the amount of such proceeds which remains encumbered by and the amount of such proceeds which is free of this restriction and shall advise the commissioner of such information. For such purposes, the commissioner shall cause the amount of proceeds from Type I licenses to be identified and proceeds from Type Y licenses to be accompanied by information as to the ages of the license recipients;

No expenditure or disbursement may be made from the principal and interest of the fund except as otherwise provided by law;

The principal and interest of the fund must be spent only for the conservation and management of wildlife and fisheries resources and the acquisition of habitat upon which such resources are dependent;

No such habitat acquired with money from the fund shall be voluntarily transferred to the federal government or any international agency or organization;

The trustee of the Wildlife Endowment Fund may accumulate the income of the fund and may direct expenditures from the income of the fund; and

Expenditure of the income derived from the fund must be made with the approval of the trustee in accordance with the provisions of the General Appropriations Act. The fund is subject to the oversight of the state treasurer.

The fund and income from it do not take the place of other state appropriations or agency receipts but are supplemental to other funds and appropriations made available to the department for carrying out its responsibilities under this title.

If the Department of Natural Resources is dissolved, the chief executive officer of the succeeding agency shall assume the trusteeship of the fund and shall be bound by all the limitations and restrictions placed by this Code section on expenditures from the fund. No repeal or modification of this Code section alters the fundamental purposes to which the fund is applied. No future dissolution of the Department of Natural Resources or substitution of any agency in its stead shall invalidate any lifetime license issued in accordance with this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 826, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 27/HB 79; Ga. L. 2014, p. 859, § 2/HB 786; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 27/HB 90; Ga. L. 2021, p. 761, § 10/HB 511.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “In recognition of its obligations to lifetime sportsman’s license purchasers, the General Assembly directs the department to establish a fund known as the Wildlife Endowment Fund for receipt of funds of an amount equal to that generated by the sale of lifetime sportsman’s licenses listed in subsection (d) of Code Section 27-2-3.1. Further, the General Assembly declares its intent to appropriate to the Wildlife Endowment Fund each fiscal year an amount equal to that generated by the prior year’s sales of lifetime licenses. The fund is also authorized to accept contributions from private individuals and entities. All funds appropriated and those contributed to the Wildlife Endowment Fund shall be deemed expended and contractually obligated and shall not lapse to the general fund.”; added subsection (c); redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (c.1); in subsection (c.1), inserted “Trust”, in the first sentence, and deleted the former second and third sentences, which read: “The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the Wildlife Endowment Fund and shall invest its assets in accordance with Georgia laws and shall report to the department the annual income and contributions to the fund. The intent of the General Assembly is that such income from the fund be appropriated annually to the department for the purposes stated in subsection (d) of this Code section.”; and added subsections (c.2) and (c.3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, in subsection (d), a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (d)(4).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 761, § 23/HB511, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In accordance with the requirements of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(r) of the Constitution of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two thirds’ majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives and the amount of the funds dedicated by this Act do not equal or exceed 1 percent of the previous fiscal year’s state revenues subject to appropriations.”

27-2-31.
Wildlife control permits.

The department is authorized to issue wildlife control permits authorizing the permittee to trap, transport and release, or kill wildlife and feral hogs where such action is otherwise prohibited by law or regulation:

When the department determines that there is a substantial likelihood the presence of such wildlife will endanger or cause injury to persons or will destroy or damage agricultural crops, domestic animals, buildings, structures, or other personal property;

For the control of white-tailed deer on airport property; provided, however, that permits shall be issued under this paragraph for purposes of public safety, and the control of white-tailed deer for other purposes and the removal of black bear shall be as provided in Code Sections 27-2-18 and 27-3-21, respectively;

For fur-bearing animals, as defined in paragraph (31) of Code Section 27-1-2, to implement a bona fide wildlife management plan that has been approved by the department; and

For feral hogs, provided that:

All permitted activities must comply with all rules and regulations of the Department of Agriculture; and

No person shall transport any live feral hog without carrying on his or her person a feral hog transport permit issued by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to Code Section 2-7-201, and no person shall release any trapped or transported feral hog into any area that is not fenced to prevent the escape of such feral hog onto the land of another.

Any person who violates division (i) of this subparagraph shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished as provided by Code Section 17-10-4; provided, however, that if a fine is imposed pursuant to such Code section, such fine shall be not less than $1,500.00.

Any license or permit previously issued under this title to any person convicted of violating division (i) of this subparagraph shall by operation of law be revoked and shall not be reissued for a period of three years after the date of such conviction. The licensee or permit holder shall be notified of the revocation personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the name and address indicated on the application for the license or permit, or both, or to the Secretary of State as provided in Code Section 27-2-24.

In issuing a wildlife control permit, the department shall prescribe the method, means, species, numbers, time limits, location, and any other conditions it deems necessary to ensure the continued viability of the wildlife population involved and to ensure that the public safety and interest are not compromised.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a wildlife control permit for feral hogs shall authorize the hunting or trapping of such feral hogs:

At night with a light except during the season prescribed for hunting deer;

From within a motor vehicle or while on a motor vehicle; and

By a Georgia resident without a hunting or trapping license if such hunting occurs on premises owned by the permittee or his or her immediate family or leased by him or her or his or her immediate family and used primarily for raising or harvesting crops other than timber or for containing livestock or poultry. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to affect or negate the terms of any lease agreement.

A wildlife control permit for feral hogs shall expire not less than five years from the issuing date; provided, however, that if the permittee is leasing the premises upon which the hunting is to occur, such permit shall expire automatically upon the termination of the lease. The department shall provide for the renewal of permits.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to authorize the taking of any species which is protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, Public Law 93-205, as amended, or under any state law or regulation which has as its purpose the protection of endangered or threatened species.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 418, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 27; Ga. L. 2011, p. 468, § 1/HB 485; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 5/HB 475.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 1/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Feral Hog Control Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 2/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that feral hogs are an invasive species in Georgia and are detrimental to the natural resources and agricultural production of the state.
Feral hogs cause significant damage to crops and wildlife habitat.
In addition, as carriers of communicable diseases, feral hogs pose a health risk to humans, livestock, companion animals, pets, and native wildlife.”

U.S. Code.

The federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 1531

et seq.

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 enactment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 202 (2000).